California statutes. Vehicle Code
(b) A violation of Division 14.85 (commencing with Section 34600), relating to motor carriers of property, is a misdemeanor and not an infraction.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 19) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 500, Sec. 20.   (AB 529)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.23.

A violation of any of the following provisions is a misdemeanor, and not an infraction:

(a) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 35784, relating to special permit violations.

(b) Subdivision (a) of Section 35784.5 relating to extralegal loads and operation of vehicles without a special permit.

(c) Other provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 35550) of Division 15, which relate to weight restrictions, except in cases of weight violations where the amount of excess weight is less than 4,501 pounds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 542, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.24.

A violation of any of the following provisions shall constitute a misdemeanor and not an infraction:

(a) Subdivision (c) of Section 38301.5, relating to unauthorized operation of a vehicle within a mountain fire district.

(b) Section 38316, relating to reckless driving.

(c) Section 38317, relating to reckless driving with injury.

(d) Subdivision (a) of Section 38318 or subdivision (a) of Section 38318.5, relating to off-highway vehicles.

(e) Section 38319, relating to protection of the environment.

(f) Section 38320, relating to the depositing of matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1015, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.25.

A violation of any of the following provisions shall constitute a misdemeanor, and not an infraction:

Section 40005, relating to owner’s responsibility.

Section 40504, relating to false signatures.

Section 40508, relating to failure to appear or to pay fine.

Section 40519, relating to failure to appear.

Section 40614, relating to use of a fictitious name.

Section 40616, relating to a willful violation of a notice to correct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 85, Sec. 1.   (AB 466)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.26.

A violation of subdivision (g) of Section 34501.12 or subdivision (d) of Section 34501.14, relating to inspections, is a misdemeanor and not an infraction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 107.1.   Effective September 30, 1992.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 117 of Ch. 1243.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.28.

Any offense which would otherwise be an infraction is a misdemeanor if a defendant has been convicted of three or more violations of this code or any local ordinance adopted pursuant to this code within the 12-month period immediately preceding the commission of the offense and such prior convictions are admitted by the defendant or alleged in the accusatory pleading. For this purpose, a bail forfeiture shall be deemed to be a conviction of the offense charged.

This section shall have no application to violations by pedestrians.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 635.)
-------------------------------------------

40001.

(a) It is unlawful for the owner, or any other person, employing or otherwise directing the driver of any vehicle to cause the operation of the vehicle upon a highway in any manner contrary to law.

(b) It is unlawful for an owner to request, cause, or permit the operation of any vehicle that is any of the following:

(1) Not registered or for which any fee has not been paid under this code.

(2) Not equipped as required in this code.

(3) Not in compliance with the size, weight, or load provisions of this code.

(4) Not in compliance with the regulations promulgated pursuant to this code, or with applicable city or county ordinances adopted pursuant to this code.

(5) Not in compliance with the provisions of Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code and the rules and regulations of the State Air Resources Board.

(c) Any employer who violates an out-of-service order, that complies with Section 396.9 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or who knowingly requires or permits a driver to violate or fail to comply with that out-of-service order, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) An employer who is convicted of allowing, permitting, requiring, or authorizing a driver to operate a commercial motor vehicle in violation of any statute or regulation pertaining to a railroad-highway grade crossing is subject to a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(e) Whenever a violation is chargeable to the owner or lessee of a vehicle pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the driver shall not be arrested or cited for the violation unless the vehicle is registered in a state or country other than California, or unless the violation is for an offense that is clearly within the responsibility of the driver.

(f) Whenever the owner, or lessee, or any other person is prosecuted for a violation pursuant to this section, the court may, on the request of the defendant, take appropriate steps to make the driver of the vehicle, or any other person who directs the loading, maintenance, or operation of the vehicle, a codefendant. However, the court may make the driver a codefendant only if the driver is the owner or lessee of the vehicle, or the driver is an employee or a contractor of the defendant who requested the court to make the driver a codefendant. If the codefendant is held solely responsible and found guilty, the court may dismiss the charge against the defendant.

(g) In any prosecution under this section, it is a rebuttable presumption that any person who gives false or erroneous information in a written certification of actual gross cargo weight has directed, requested, caused, or permitted the operation of a vehicle in a manner contrary to law in violation of subdivision (a) or (b), or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 200.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

40002.

(a) (1) If there is a violation of Section 40001, an owner or any other person subject to Section 40001, who was not driving the vehicle involved in the violation, may be mailed a written notice to appear. An exact and legible duplicate copy of that notice when filed with the court, in lieu of a verified complaint, is a complaint to which the defendant may plead “guilty.”

(2) If, however, the defendant fails to appear in court or does not deposit lawful bail, or pleads other than “guilty” of the offense charged, a verified complaint shall be filed which shall be deemed to be an original complaint, and thereafter proceedings shall be had as provided by law,
 except that a defendant may, by an agreement in writing, subscribed by the defendant and filed with the court, waive the filing of a verified complaint and elect that the prosecution may proceed upon a written notice to appear.

(3) A verified complaint pursuant to paragraph (2) shall include a paragraph that informs the person that unless he or she appears in the court designated in the complaint within 21 days after being given the complaint and answers the charge, renewal of registration of the vehicle involved in the offense may be precluded by the department, or a warrant of arrest may be issued against him or her.

(b) (1) If a person mailed a notice to appear pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) fails to appear in court or deposit bail, a warrant of arrest shall not be issued based on the notice to appear, even if that notice is verified. An
 arrest warrant may be issued only after a verified complaint pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) is given the person and the person fails to appear in court to answer that complaint.

(2) If a person mailed a notice to appear pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) fails to appear in court or deposit bail, the court may give by mail to the person a notice of noncompliance. A notice of noncompliance shall include a paragraph that informs the person that unless he or she appears in the court designated in the notice to appear within 21 days after being given by mail the notice of noncompliance and answers the charge on the notice to appear, or pays the applicable fine and penalties if an appearance is not required, renewal of registration of the vehicle involved in the offense may be precluded by the department.

(c) A verified complaint filed pursuant to this section
 shall conform to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 948) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(d) (1) The giving by mail of a notice to appear pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or a notice of noncompliance pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall be done in a manner prescribed by Section 22.

(2) The verified complaint pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be given in a manner prescribed by Section 22.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 232.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

40002.1.

(a) Whenever a person has failed to appear in the court designated in the notice to appear or a verified complaint specified in Section 40002, following personal service of the notice of noncompliance or deposit in the mail pursuant to Section 22, the magistrate or clerk of the court may give notice of that fact to the department.

(b) Whenever the matter is adjudicated, including a dismissal of the charges upon forfeiture of bail or otherwise, the magistrate or clerk of the court hearing the matter shall immediately do all of the following:

(1) Endorse a certificate to that effect.

(2) Provide the person or the person’s attorney with a copy of the certificate.

(3) Transmit a copy of the certificate to the department.

(c) A notice of noncompliance shall not be transmitted to the department pursuant to subdivision (a) if a warrant of arrest has been issued on the same offense pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 40002. A warrant of arrest shall not be issued pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 40002 if a notice of noncompliance has been transmitted to the department on the same offense pursuant to this section, except that, when a notice has been received by the court pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4766 or recalled by motion of the court, a warrant may then be issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 452, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

40003.

Whenever an employee is prosecuted for a violation of any provision of this code, or regulations promulgated pursuant to this code, relating to the size, weight, registration, equipment, or loading of a vehicle while operating a vehicle he was employed to operate, and which is owned by his employer, the court shall on the request of the employee take appropriate proceedings to make the owner of the vehicle a codefendant. In the event it is found that the employee had reasonable grounds to believe that the vehicle operated by him as an employee did not violate such provisions, and in the event the owner is found guilty under the provisions of Section 40001, the court may dismiss the charges against the employee.

In those cases in which the charges against the employee are dismissed, the abstract of the record of the court required by Section 1803 shall clearly indicate that such charges were dismissed and that the owner of the vehicle was found guilty under Section 40001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

40004.

(a) The period for commencing criminal action against any person having filed or caused to be filed any false, fictitious, altered, forged or counterfeit document with the Department of Motor Vehicles or the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall, if the offense is a misdemeanor, expire one year from time of discovery of such act.

(b) The period for commencing criminal action against any person having filed or caused to be filed any false, fictitious, altered, forged or counterfeit document with the Department of Motor Vehicles or the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall, if the offense is a felony, expire three years from time of discovery of such act.

(c) The time allowed for commencing criminal proceedings as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section shall not extend beyond five years from the date of commission of the act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

40005.

Whenever a driver is cited for a violation of any provision of this code, or regulations promulgated pursuant to this code, relating to the size, weight, equipment, registration, fees, or loading of a vehicle, while operating a vehicle he was employed or otherwise directed to operate, and which is not owned by him, and the driver gives the citation to the owner or any other person referred to in Section 40001, if the owner or other person undertakes to answer the charge or otherwise to cause its disposition without any further action by the driver and then fails to act in accordance with the undertaking as a consequence of which a warrant is issued for the arrest of the driver, the owner or other person is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 294.)
-------------------------------------------

40006.

Whenever a disabled vehicle, being taken to a repair shop, garage, or other place of storage, is being towed upon a highway by a tow car and the vehicle is determined to be in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 4000, the violation shall be charged as prescribed in Section 40001.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

40007.

Division 5 (commencing with Section 11100) does not preclude the application of any other statutory provision which is applicable to any act violating any provision of Division 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 93, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

40008.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), any person who violates Section 21701, 21703, or 23103, with the intent to capture any type of visual image, sound recording, or other physical impression of another person for a commercial purpose, is guilty of a misdemeanor and not an infraction and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months and by a fine of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), any person who violates Section 21701, 21703, or 23103, with the intent to capture any type of visual image, sound recording, or other physical impression of another person for a commercial purpose and who causes a minor child or
 children to be placed in a situation in which the child’s person or health is endangered, is guilty of a misdemeanor and not an infraction and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year and by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(c) Pursuant to Section 654 of the Penal Code, an act or omission described in subdivision (a) or (b) that is punishable in different ways by different provisions of law shall be punished under the provision that provides for the longest potential term of imprisonment, but in no case shall the act or omission be punished under more than one provision. An acquittal or conviction and sentence under any one provision bars a prosecution for the same act or omission under any other provision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 685, Sec. 3.   (AB 2479)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Procedure on Equipment and Registration Violations [40150. - 40152.]

40150.

Whenever any vehicle or combination of vehicles is found to be in an unsafe mechanical condition or is not equipped as required by this code, and a notice to appear is issued or a complaint filed for such violation, the notice to appear or the complaint may require that the person to whom the notice to appear is issued or against whom the complaint is filed shall produce in court satisfactory evidence that the vehicle or its equipment has been made to conform with the requirements of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1728.)
-------------------------------------------

40151.

(a) Whenever any lighting equipment or device does not meet requirements established by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the officer making the inspection shall direct the driver to remove the lighting equipment or device within 24 hours.

(b) Whenever any lighting equipment or device meets requirements established by the department but by reason of faulty adjustment or otherwise fails to comply with this code, the officer making the inspection shall direct the driver to make it comply with this code within 48 hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 723.)
-------------------------------------------

40152.

(a) Whenever any vehicle or combination of vehicles is found to be not registered as required by this code, and a notice to appear is issued or a complaint is filed for that violation, the person to whom the notice to appear is issued or against whom the complaint is filed shall produce in court satisfactory evidence that the vehicle or combination of vehicles has been registered or has had the appropriate fees paid, or has been reduced to junk, to conform with the requirements of this code. The court shall not dismiss the offense until that evidence is produced.

(b) A four-day, nonresident commercial trip permit of the type authorized in Section 4004 may not be accepted as evidence of registration compliance as required in subdivision (a) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1154, Sec. 83.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Procedure on Parking Violations [40200. - 40230.]

40200.

(a) Any violation of any regulation that is not a misdemeanor governing the standing or parking of a vehicle under this code, under any federal statute or regulation, or under any ordinance enacted by local authorities is subject to a civil penalty. The enforcement of those civil penalties shall be governed by the civil administrative procedures set forth in this article.

(b) Except as provided in Section 40209, the registered owner and driver, rentee, or lessee of a vehicle cited for any violation of any regulation governing the parking of a vehicle under this code, under any federal statute or regulation, or under any ordinance enacted by a local authority shall be jointly liable for parking penalties imposed under this article, unless the owner can show that the vehicle was used without consent of that person, express or implied. An owner who pays any parking penalty, civil judgment, costs, or administrative fees pursuant to this article shall have the right to recover the same from the driver, rentee, or lessee.

(c) The driver of a vehicle who is not the owner thereof but who uses or operates the vehicle with the express or implied permission of the owner shall be considered the agent of the owner to receive notices of parking violations served in accordance with this article and may contest the notice of violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1093, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

40200.1.

A person shall not be subject to both a notice of parking violation and a notice to appear for the same violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 415, Sec. 5.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

40200.3.

(a) All parking penalties collected by the processing agency, which may be the issuing agency, including process service fees and fees and collection costs related to civil debt collection, shall be deposited to the account of the issuing agency, except that those sums attributable to the issuance of a notice of parking violation by a peace officer of the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall be deposited in the account in the jurisdiction where the violation occurred, and except those sums payable to a county pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 76000) of Title 8 of the Government Code and that portion of any parking penalty which is attributable to an increase in the parking bail amount effective between September 16, 1988, and July 1, 1992, inclusive, pursuant to Section 1463.28 of the Penal Code. Those funds attributable to this increase in bail shall be transferred to the county treasurer and deposited in the general fund. Any increase in parking penalties effective after July 1, 1992, shall accrue to the benefit of the issuing agency.

(b) The processing agency shall prepare a report at the end of each fiscal year setting forth the number of cases processed, and all sums received and distributed, together with any other information that may be required by the issuing agency or the Controller. This report is a public record and shall be delivered to each issuing agency. Copies shall be made available, upon request, to the county auditor, the Controller, and the grand jury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 305, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

40200.4.

(a) The processing agency shall deposit with the county treasurer all sums due the county as the result of processing a parking violation not later than 45 calendar days after the last day of the month in which the parking penalty was received.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), if a court within a county has been processing notices of parking violations and notices of delinquent parking violations for a city, a district, or any other issuing agency, the issuing agency and the county shall provide in an agreement for the orderly transfer of the processing activity as soon as possible but not later than January 1, 1994. The agreement shall permit the court to phase out, and the issuing agency to phase in, or transfer, personnel, equipment, and facilities that may have been acquired or need to be acquired in contemplation of a long-term commitment to processing of notices of parking violations and notices of delinquent parking violations for the issuing agency under this article. The court shall transfer the processing function for parking citations issued by the Department of the California Highway Patrol to the processing agency in the city or county where the violation occurred.

(c) If Contra Costa County or San Mateo County, or a court in either county, had a contract in effect on January 1, 1992, to process notices of parking violations and notices of delinquent parking violations for a city, district, or other issuing agency within the particular county or counties, the county may continue to provide those services to the issuing agencies pursuant to the terms of the contract and any amendments thereto, to and including June 30, 1996, after which Section 40200.5 shall govern any contracts entered into for these services.

(d) San Francisco Municipal Court employees engaged in processing notices of parking violations and the positions of those employees shall be transferred to equivalent civil service positions in the City and County of San Francisco.

(e) No court employee shall be terminated or otherwise released from employment as a result of the transfer of processing notices of parking violations and notices of delinquent parking violations from the courts to the issuing agencies.

(f) As used in this article, “parking penalty” includes the fine authorized by law, including assessments authorized by this article, any late payment penalty, and costs of collection as provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 305, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

40200.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 40200.4, an issuing agency may elect to contract with the county, with a private vendor, or with any other city or county processing agency, other than the Department of the California Highway Patrol or other state law enforcement agency, within the county, with the consent of that other entity, for the processing of notices of parking violations and notices of delinquent parking violations, prior to filing with the court pursuant to Section 40230.

If an issuing agency contracts with a private vendor for processing services, it shall give special consideration to minority business enterprise participation in providing those services. For purposes of this subdivision, “special consideration” has the same meaning as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 14838 of the Government Code, as it relates to small business preference.

(b) A contract entered pursuant to subdivision (a) shall provide for monthly distribution of amounts collected between the parties, except those amounts payable to a county pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 76000) of Title 8 of the Government Code and amounts payable to the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to Section 4763 of this code.

(c) If a contract entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) includes the provision of qualified examiners or administrative hearing providers, the contract shall be based on either a fixed monthly rate or on the number of notices processed and shall not include incentives for the processing entity based on the number of notices upheld or denied or the amount of fines collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

40200.6.

(a) If a contract is entered into pursuant to Section 40200.5, for the purposes of this article, “processing agency” means the contracting party responsible for the processing of the notices of parking violations and notices of delinquent parking violations. 

(b) The governing body of the issuing agency shall establish written policies and procedures pursuant to which the contracting party shall provide services.

(c) The issuing agency shall be responsible for all actions taken by contracting parties and shall exercise effective oversight over the parties. “Effective oversight” includes, at a minimum, an annual review of the services of the processing agency and a review of complaints made by motorists using the services of the processing agency. The issuing agency shall establish procedures to investigate and resolve complaints by motorists about any processing agency.

(d) Subdivision (c) does not apply to an issuing agency that is a law enforcement agency if the issuing agency does not also act as the processing agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 734, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40200.8.

The parking processing agency shall notify the department and recall any hold on the registration of a vehicle that it filed with the department in connection with a parking citation if the processing agency is awarded a civil judgment for the citation pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 40220, or if the processing agency has granted a review of the issuance of the citation pursuant to Section 40200.7 or Section 40215.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 766, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40202.

(a) If a vehicle is unattended during the time of the violation, the peace officer or person authorized to enforce parking laws and regulations shall securely attach to the vehicle a notice of parking violation setting forth the violation, including reference to the section of this code or of the Public Resources Code, the local ordinance, or the federal statute or regulation so violated; the date; the approximate time thereof; the location where the violation occurred; a statement printed on the notice indicating that the date of payment is required to be made not later than 21 calendar days from the date of citation issuance; and the procedure for the registered owner, lessee, or rentee to deposit the parking penalty or, pursuant to Section 40215, contest the citation. The notice of parking violation shall also set forth the vehicle license number and registration expiration date if they are visible, the last four digits of the vehicle identification number, if that number is readable through the windshield, the color of the vehicle, and, if possible, the make of the vehicle. The notice of parking violation, or copy thereof, shall be considered a record kept in the ordinary course of business of the issuing agency and the processing agency and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein.

(b) The notice of parking violation shall be served by attaching it to the vehicle either under the windshield wiper or in another conspicuous place upon the vehicle so as to be easily observed by the person in charge of the vehicle upon the return of that person.

(c) Once the issuing officer has prepared the notice of parking violation and has attached it to the vehicle as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b), the officer shall file the notice with the processing agency. Any person, including the issuing officer and any member of the officer’s department or agency, or any peace officer who alters, conceals, modifies, nullifies, or destroys, or causes to be altered, concealed, modified, nullified, or destroyed the face of the remaining original or any copy of a citation that was retained by the officer, for any reason, before it is filed with the processing agency or with a person authorized to receive the deposit of the parking penalty, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) If, during the issuance of a notice of parking violation, without regard to whether the vehicle was initially attended or unattended, the vehicle is driven away prior to attaching the notice to the vehicle, the issuing officer shall file the notice with the processing agency. The processing agency shall mail, within 15 calendar days of issuance of the notice of parking violation, a copy of the notice of parking violation or transmit an electronic facsimile of the notice to the registered owner.

(e) If, within 21 days after the notice of parking violation is attached to the vehicle, the issuing officer or the issuing agency determines that, in the interest of justice, the notice of parking violation should be canceled, the issuing agency, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40215, shall cancel the notice of parking violation or, if the issuing agency has contracted with a processing agency, shall notify the processing agency to cancel the notice of parking violation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40215. The reason for the cancellation shall be set forth in writing.

If, after a copy of the notice of parking violation is attached to the vehicle, the issuing officer determines that there is incorrect data on the notice, including, but not limited to, the date or time, the issuing officer may indicate in writing, on a form attached to the original notice, the necessary correction to allow for the timely entry of the notice on the processing agency’s data system. A copy of the correction shall be mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle.

(f) Under no circumstances shall a personal relationship with any officer, public official, or law enforcement agency be grounds for cancellation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 885, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

40203.

The notice of parking violation shall be accompanied by a written notice of the amount of the parking penalty due for that violation, the address of the person authorized to receive a deposit of the parking penalty, a statement in bold print that payments of the parking penalty for the parking violation may be sent through the mail, and instructions on obtaining information on the procedures to contest the notice of parking violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 734, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

40203.5.

(a) The schedule of parking penalties for parking violations and late payment penalties shall be established by the governing body of the jurisdiction where the notice of violation is issued. To the extent possible, issuing agencies within the same county shall standardize parking penalties.

(b) Parking penalties under this article shall be collected as civil penalties.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) the penalty for a violation of Section
 22507.8 or an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to Section 22511.57 shall be not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) The issuing agency may suspend the imposition of the penalty in paragraph (1), if the violator, at the time of the offense, possesses but failed to display a valid special identification license plate issued pursuant to Section 5007 or a distinguishing placard issued pursuant to Section 22511.55 or 22511.59.

(3) A penalty imposed pursuant to this subdivision may be paid in installments if the issuing agency determines that the violator is unable to pay the entire amount in one
 payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 415, Sec. 6.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

40203.6.

(a) In addition to an assessment levied pursuant to any other law, an additional assessment equal to 10 percent of the penalty established pursuant to Section 40203.5 shall be imposed by the governing body of the jurisdiction where the notice of parking violation is issued for a civil violation of any of the following:

(1) Subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 4461.

(2) Subdivision (c) of Section 4463.

(3) Section 22507.8.

(4) An ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to Section 22511.57.

(5) Section 22522.

(b) An assessment imposed pursuant to this section shall be deposited with the city or county where the violation occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 415, Sec. 7.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

40204.

(a) If the parking penalty is received by the person authorized to receive the deposit of the parking penalty and there is no contest as to that parking violation, the proceedings under this article shall terminate.

(b) The issuing agency may, consistent with the written guidelines established by the agency, allow payment of the parking penalty in installments if the violator provides evidence satisfactory to the issuing agency
 of an inability to pay the parking penalty in full.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 112, Sec. 1.   (AB 1151)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

40205.

If a person contests the parking violation, the processing agency shall proceed in accordance with Section 40215.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1244, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1244.)
-------------------------------------------

40206.

(a) If the payment of the parking penalty is not received by the person authorized to receive a deposit of the parking penalty by the date fixed on the notice of parking violation under Section 40202, the processing agency shall deliver to the registered owner a notice of delinquent parking violation.

(b) Delivery of a notice of delinquent parking violation under this section may be made by personal service or by first-class mail addressed to the registered owner, as shown on records of the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1244, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 39 of Ch. 1244.)
-------------------------------------------

40206.5.

(a) Within 15 days of a request, by mail or in person, the processing agency shall mail or otherwise provide to any person who has received a notice of delinquent parking violation, or his or her agent, a photostatic copy of the original notice of parking violation or an electronically produced facsimile of the original notice of parking violation. The issuing agency may charge a fee sufficient to recover the actual cost of providing the copy, not to exceed two dollars ($2). Until the issuing agency complies with a request for a copy of the original notice of parking violation, the processing agency may not proceed pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 22651, Section 22651.7, or Section 40220.

(b) If the description of the vehicle on the notice of parking violation does not substantially match the corresponding information on the registration card for that vehicle and the processing agency is satisfied that the vehicle has not been incorrectly described due to the intentional switching of license plates, the processing agency shall, on written request of the person cancel the notice of parking violation without the necessity of an appearance by that person.

(c) For purposes of this section, a copy of the notice of parking violation may be a photostatic copy or an electronically produced facsimile.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1093, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

40207.

(a) The notice of delinquent parking violation shall contain the information specified in subdivision (a) of Section 40202 or subdivision (a) of Section 40248, as applicable, and Section 40203, and, additionally shall contain a notice to the registered owner that, unless the registered owner pays the parking penalty or contests the citation within 21 calendar days from the date of issuance of the citation or 14 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of delinquent parking violation or completes and files an affidavit of nonliability that complies with Section 40208 or 40209, the renewal of the vehicle registration shall be contingent upon compliance with the notice of delinquent parking violation. If the registered owner, by appearance or by mail, makes payment to the processing
 agency within 21 calendar days from the date of issuance of the citation or 14 calendar days after the mailing of the notice of delinquent parking violation, the parking penalty shall consist solely of the amount of the original penalty. Additional fees, assessments, or other charges shall not be added.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 471, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 325, Sec. 2.   (AB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Section operative January 1, 2016, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

40208.

The notice of delinquent parking violation shall contain, or be accompanied with, an affidavit of nonliability and information of what constitutes nonliability, information as to the effect of executing the affidavit, and instructions for returning the affidavit to the issuing agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 939, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

40209.
